Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1542
Specific Authority for Reports, defined.

The short form expression, Specific Authority for Reports, shall mean that the principal generally authorizes and empowers the agent to acknowledge, deliver, execute, file, prepare, receive, record, seal, sign, verify, or witness and otherwise to make, omit, or take other action as to, or otherwise dispose of, any form, notification, return, or other report from or to any corporate entity, any other business, governmental, or private entity, or any other person.

Laws 1988, LB 475, § 42.